North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-40 Emergency Medical Services Allocations [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 3]

Note.

For comparable provisions, see now N.D.C.C. ch. 23-46.

23-40-01.
Eligibility. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 3.

23-40-02.
Application. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 3.

23-40-03.
Strategic plan. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 3.

23-40-04.
Eligibility for distribution of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 3.

23-40-05.
Allocation for distribution of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 3.

23-40-06.
Use of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 3.